Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 3

Vacancies

17-1-301. Vacancies in office.

If a vacancy occurs during the term of office of a judge of the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals, then the governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. The governor's appointee shall be confirmed and shall stand for election in a retention election in accordance with chapter 4, part 1 of this title.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a chancellor, circuit court judge, criminal court judge, or judge of any other state trial court of record, the vacancy shall be filled in accordance with chapter 4, part 3 of this title.

Acts 1870, ch. 24, § 6; 1871, ch. 128, §§ 1, 2; 1895, ch. 76, § 6; Shan., §§ 381, 6316; mod. Code 1932, §§ 637, 10609; modified; Acts 1965, ch. 289, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1967, ch. 226, § 3; 1969, ch. 138, § 1; 1979, ch. 384, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-112; Acts 1999, ch. 315, § 1; 2007, ch. 190, § 1; 2016, ch. 528, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) If a vacancy occurs during the term of office of a judge of a circuit, chancery or criminal court, or any other state trial court of record, then the vacancy must be filled by the qualified voters of the judicial district at the next regular August election occurring more than thirty (30) days after the vacancy arises. For the purposes of this subsection (a), a vacancy shall be deemed to exist if, prior to September 1, the duly elected successor to any judicial office becomes ineligible as a result of death or other disqualifying event. In accordance with §17-4-118, the governor shall appoint a person to discharge the duties of such office until August 31 following the election.“(b) If a vacancy occurs during the term of office of a judge of the court of appeals or court of criminal appeals, then the vacancy must be filled in accordance with chapter 4 of this title, from the grand division in which the vacancy occurs.“(c) If a vacancy occurs during the term of office of a judge of the supreme court, then the vacancy must be filled in accordance with chapter 4 of this title and the requirements of Tenn. Const. art. VI, § 2.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Court of appeals and court of criminal appeals, vacancy, §17-4-112.

Election to fill vacancy, §8-18-104.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Impeachment of judges or chancellors, title 8, ch. 46.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Necessary Qualifications for Judgeships, 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 640.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

Attorney General Opinions. Residency requirements for the appellate courts, OAG 94-141 (11/28/94).

Filling supreme court vacancy after negative retention election vote, OAG 96-117 (9/9/96).

Cited: Barry v. Lauck, 45 Tenn. 588, 1868 Tenn. LEXIS 52 (1868); Gold v. Fite, 61 Tenn. 237, 1872 Tenn. LEXIS 366 (1872); La Fever v. Ware, 211 Tenn. 393, 365 S.W.2d 44, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 358 (1963); Cornelius v. McWilliams, 641 S.W.2d 508, 1982 Tenn. App. LEXIS 494 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1982).

17-1-302. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, §§ 312-314 (deriv. Acts 1853-1854, ch. 32, § 6); Acts 1895, ch. 76, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1907, ch. 436; Shan., §§ 382-384, 6316; mod. Code 1932, §§ 638-640, 10609; Acts 1969, ch. 138, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 384, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-113; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 8, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former §17-1-302 concerned writs for special elections.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-1-303. Vacancy in office of county judge.

Whenever a vacancy, either by death, resignation or removal, occurs in the office of county judge, it shall be filled by the qualified voters of the county at the first regular election in August for any of the county officers, more than forty-five (45) days after the happening of the vacancy. In the meantime, the county legislative body, at its first meeting after the happening of the vacancy, shall elect a person learned in the law and legally qualified to discharge the duties of the office until the election by the people can be had. If the county legislative body fails or refuses to elect a successor to fill the office until the next regular August election, at its first meeting after the happening of the vacancy, then the governor shall appoint some person learned in the law and legally qualified to discharge the duties of the office, who shall serve until the next regular election in August, at which time the vacancy shall be filled by the qualified voters of the county.

Unless the county legislative body is to have a regular meeting within ten (10) days after the vacancy occurs, it shall be the duty of the county clerk, or, in the county clerk's absence or inability to act, of the county clerk's deputy, and the clerk or deputy is empowered, immediately upon the occurrence of the vacancy, to give notice of a special meeting of the county legislative body to be held ten (10) days after the date of the notice, unless the date thus set falls upon a Sunday or holiday, in which case the meeting shall be fixed for the next business day, for the election of the person to fill the vacancy. The meeting shall be held upon the date thus fixed, and the presiding officer for the meeting shall be elected by the county legislative body.

Acts 1871, ch. 128, § 3; Shan., § 386; mod. Code 1932, § 641; Acts 1933, ch. 141, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 641; Acts 1965, ch. 289, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-115.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Necessary Qualifications for Judgeships, 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 640.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

Cited: State ex rel. Condon v. Maloney, 108 Tenn. 82, 65 S.W. 871, 1901 Tenn. LEXIS 12 (1901); La Fever v. Ware, 211 Tenn. 393, 365 S.W.2d 44, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 358 (1963).

17-1-304. Powers after vacation of office.

Whenever any trial judge vacates the office of judge for any cause whatsoever, other than the death or permanent insanity of the judge, the judge shall have and retain, as to cases pending before the judge, the trial of which has begun prior to the judge's vacation of office, all the powers in connection with the cases that the judge might have exercised therein, had the vacation of office not occurred.

The judge's powers in this respect shall not extend beyond sixty (60) days from the date of such vacation of office.

The powers shall especially include, but shall not be limited to, the right to render judgments, to hear and determine motions for new trial, to grant appeals and to approve bills of exceptions.

The powers may be exercised by the judge either within or without the geographical limits assigned by law to the judge.

Acts 1945, ch. 21, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9949.1; Acts 1973, ch. 116, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.12.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, §§ 7, 9.

Law Reviews.

The Constitutional Policy That Judges Be Learned in the Law (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 689.

Cited: De Long v. Pans Hans Properties, 626 S.W.2d 697, 1982 Tenn. LEXIS 376 (Tenn. 1982); State v. Brown, 644 S.W.2d 418, 1982 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 398 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1982).

17-1-305. New trial in event of vacancy in office.

When a vacancy in the office of trial judge exists by reason of death, permanent insanity as evidenced by adjudication, impeachment and conviction under Tenn. Const. art. V, or removal under Tenn. Const. art. VI, § 6, after verdict, but before the hearing of the motion for new trial, the trial judge's successor shall rule on the defendant's motion for new trial after the successor judge has reviewed the transcript and entire record of the trial.

Acts 1945, ch. 21, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 9949.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-117; Acts 1994, ch. 833, § 1; 1996, ch. 926, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Grounds for impeachment of a United States District Court Judge, OAG 97-080 (5/21/97).

Law Reviews.

Procedure and Evidence — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1197.

17-1-306. Death or insanity pending appeal.

Whenever such a vacancy arising from death or permanent insanity, evidenced by adjudication, occurs after disposition of the motion for new trial and appeal prayed and granted, but before the expiration of the time allowed for filing the bill of exceptions, the successor judge has and possesses the power to approve the bill of exceptions in such case if, after hearing, the successor judge finds that it fairly states the truth of the case.

If such successor judge is unable to determine the truth of the case as stated in the bill of exceptions, the successor judge has the power to award a new trial to the losing party.

Acts 1945, ch. 21, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 9949.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-118.

Cross-References. Bills of exception abolished, T.R.A.P. 24.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.12.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Exceptions, Bill of, § 15.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure and Evidence — Tennessee Survey 1970 (Jerry J. Phillips), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 127.

Cited: Jackson v. Handell, 46 Tenn. App. 234, 327 S.W.2d 55, 1959 Tenn. App. LEXIS 93 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1959); Howard v. State, 217 Tenn. 556, 399 S.W.2d 738, 1966 Tenn. LEXIS 609 (1966).